Massachusetts, session 194th, H3438.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 2 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 65. The Jurassic Armored Mud Ball shall be the official sedimentary structure of 
the Commonwealth.